Utah statutes.
62A-4a-306.   Programs and services -- Public hearing requirements -- Review
by local board of education.
(1)  Before any abuse or neglect prevention or treatment program or service
may be purchased or contracted for, the division shall conduct a public
hearing and the council shall conduct a public hearing, to receive public
comment on the specific program or service.
(2)  Before any abuse or neglect prevention or treatment program or service
which is intended for presentation in public schools may be purchased or
contracted for, evidence shall be submitted to the division that the program
or service has been approved by the local board of education of each school
district which will be utilizing that program or service.  The local board of
education may grant the approval authority to the superintendent.
